Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.79.020

Authority to transfer real property.

Code cities are authorized to transfer real property pursuant to RCW 43.83.400 and 43.83.410.

[ 2015 1st sp.s. c 4 s 29; 2006 c 35 s 11.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 35: See note following RCW 43.83.400.